Utah statutes.
57-8a-308.   Appointment of receiver.

In an action by an association to collect an assessment or to foreclose a lien for an unpaid assessment, a court may:

(1)  appoint a receiver, in accordance with Section 7-2-9, to collect and hold money alleged to be due and owing to a lot owner:

(a)  before commencement of the action; or

(b)  during the pendency of the action; and

(2)  order the receiver to pay the association, to the extent of the association's common expense assessment, money the receiver holds under Subsection (1).



Enacted by Chapter 355, 2011 General Session

